Hawaii, session 2026, SB2523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State of Hawaii is unique among all other states in the nation for having driver's license and motor vehicle application systems managed and operated by a county within the state instead of having a state managed and operated application system.  This arrangement has its roots in the earliest days of statehood and the unique make-up of the four counties of the State. The legislature further finds that the application system currently being managed and operated by the city and county of Honolulu was developed in the 1970's and operates on a system of code that has become increasingly antiquated and that hinders further development and maintenance of this system due to its outdated technology.  Furthermore, the current application system is operated on a mainframe hosted in the city and county that itself is becoming increasingly outdated. The legislature finds that the upgrade of the existing application system will increase efficiency of operations, enable easier access to these systems by the departments of motor vehicles and law enforcement which access this information, and will reduce maintenance costs by switching from a physical mainframe maintained by the city and county of Honolulu to a cloud-based service. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide a grant‑in-aid to the department of information technology of the city and county of Honolulu for the upgrade of this vital system. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the department of information technology of the city and county of Honolulu for the implementation of upgrades to the driver's license and motor vehicle application systems. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of information technology of the city and county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request